Hawaii statutes.
[§321-212] Tobacco products; possession or
consumption prohibited. Possession or consumption of a tobacco product by
a person under twenty-one years of age in a public place shall be prohibited.
[L 2015, c 122, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next